Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:(1) For health plans issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, the medical loss ratio shall be at least 90 percent.(2) The commissioner may adopt any rules necessary to implement this section.(3) For the purposes of this section, "medical loss ratio" means the same as in 45 C.F.R. Sec. 158.221 (2025) as of January 1, 2026.--- END ---